Utah statutes.
70A-7a-203.   Liability for nonreceipt or misdescription.
A party to or purchaser for value in good faith of a document of title, other
than a bill of lading, that relies upon the description of the goods in the
document may recover from the issuer damages caused by the nonreceipt or
misdescription of the goods, except to the extent that:
(1)  the document conspicuously indicates that the issuer does not know
whether all or part of the goods in fact were received or conform to the
description, such as a case in which the description is in terms of marks or
labels or kind, quantity, or condition, or the receipt or description is
qualified by "contents, condition, and quality unknown," "said to contain," or
words of similar import, if the indication is true; or
(2)  the party or purchaser otherwise has notice of the nonreceipt or
misdescription.
